Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7967.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 28-7-49 of the General Laws in Chapter 28-7 entitled "Labor
Relations Act" is hereby repealed.
28-7-49. No limitation on healthcare benefit providers.
No collective bargaining agreement covering any group or groups of state employees,
public school teachers, or employees of any city or town, ratified after August 1, 2008, shall specify
that an employer must procure a healthcare benefit plan from a specific provider of such plans. The
technical qualifications of the healthcare benefit plan, to be contracted for, shall not be framed or
constructed in a manner designed to identify an exclusive provider of said healthcare services.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005781
========